Hawaii, session 2026, SB1630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 531B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§531B-    Disposition of remains.  (a)  Any funeral establishment, mortuary, cemetery, crematory, or hydrolysis facility shall dispose of the remains of a dead human body no later than sixty days from the date a permit has been issued pursuant to section 338-23, or from the date of an affidavit for amendment of the permit has been submitted.  The department of health shall not be required to include the specific disposition date on the permit. (b)  The department of health shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________